Indiana, session 2026, HB1047.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-8.1-18-4.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. Notwithstanding any other
section of this chapter, a payroll service provider shall provide the
option to a business client that would allow the business client to
hold the business client's funds in a bank account that is:
(1) owned by the business client (as opposed to the payroll
service provider's bank account); and
(2) insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or
the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund.
SECTION 2. IC 6-8.1-18-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.97-2021,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A contract entered into by a business client
with a payroll service provider for third party payroll services must
include a provision that substantially specifies that if the payroll service
provider fails to deposit a business client's employer withholding taxes
when due, and the failure is caused by an error or omission of the
2026 IN 1047—LS 6100/DI 134


payroll service provider and not by the business client, the payroll
service provider shall be required to reimburse the business client for
the business client's payment of any penalties or interest assessed by
the department as a result of the failure.
(b) A payroll service provider shall obtain a performance bond
equal to the amount of the business client's total annual estimated
payroll taxes.
2026 IN 1047—LS 6100/DI 134